Utah statutes.
19-7-104.   Unlawful disclosure -- Environmental audit report.

(1)  Information that is divulged, disseminated, or otherwise disclosed in violation of Utah Rules of Evidence, Rule 508, may not be admitted as evidence in an administrative or judicial proceeding.

(2)  If any person, including a department employee or a presiding hearing officer, divulges or disseminates any part of the information contained in an environmental audit report and that report is privileged under Utah Rules of Evidence, Rule 508, the privilege is not waived except as provided under Utah Rules of Evidence, Rule 508(d)(1).

(3)  An environmental audit report obtained pursuant to an in camera review is a protected record for purposes of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, and a department employee or attorney representing the department may not disclose the report except in accordance with the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

